District of Columbia statutes.
4-704

Repealed

Assessment of homelessness.

Repealed.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-146, § 5, 31 DCR 6088
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-197, § 2(e), 37 DCR 4815
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(b), 52 DCR 8113
Director, Department of Human Services.—See Mayor’s Order 88-65, March 21, 1988.
1981 Ed., § 3-604.